North Carolina statutes. Chapter 46. Partition.
Article 2. Partition Sales of Real Property. [Repealed]

§ 46-22.

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-75

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(y), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

Cross References.

As to power of court to enter judgment for money due on judicial sales, see

G.S. 1-243

.

§ 46-22.1.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-29

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(z), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-23.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-79

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(aa), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

Cross References.

As to sale, lease or mortgage in case of remainders, see

G.S. 41-11

.

§ 46-24.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-78

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(bb), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-25.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-80

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(cc), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-26.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-81

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(dd), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-27.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-82

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(ee), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-28.
[Repealed]

Subsections (a) and (b) were recodified as G.S. 46A-76(a), (d), and subsection (c) was recodified as

G.S. 46A-77

, by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(ff), (gg), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-28.1.
[Repealed]

Subsections (a), (b), (c), (d), and (e) were recodified as

G.S. 46A-83(a)

, (c), (d), (e), and (f), subsection (d1) was recodified as

G.S. 46A-84

, and subsection (f) was recodified as G.S. 46A-85(a), by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(hh), (ii), (jj), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-28.2.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 46A-85(b) by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(kk), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-29.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1949, c. 719, s. 2.

§ 46-30.

Recodified as G.S. 46A-85(c) by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(
ll
), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-31.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 46A-76(c) by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(mm), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-32.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1949, c. 719, s. 2.

§ 46-33.

Recodified as G.S. 46A-85(d) by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(nn), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-34.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-86

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(oo), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.